Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2301.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board of examiners means the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards;

(2) City street superintendent means a person who engages in the practice of street superintending for an incorporated municipality;

(3) County highway superintendent means a person who engages in the practice of highway superintending for a county; and

(4) Street or highway superintending means assisting an incorporated municipality or a county in the following:

(a) Developing and annually updating long-range plans or programs based on needs and coordinated with adjacent local governmental units;

(b) Developing annual programs for design, construction, and maintenance;

(c) Developing annual budgets based on programmed projects and activities;

(d) Implementing the capital improvements and maintenance activities provided in the approved plans, programs, and budgets; and

(e) Managing personnel, contractors, and equipment in support of such planning, programming, budgeting, and implementation operations.

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 21;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 18.
July 1, 2026